Maryland, session 2025, HB0822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Declaration of Rights
Article 36.
[That as it is the duty of every man to worship God in such manner as he thinks
most acceptable to Him, all] ALL persons are equally entitled to protection in their religious
liberty; wherefore, no person ought by any law to be molested in [his] person or estate, on
account of [his] THE religious persuasion[,] or profession OF THE PERSON, or for [his]
THE religious practice OF THE PERSON, unless, under the color of religion, [he] THE
PERSON shall disturb the good order, peace or safety of the State, or [shall infringe the
laws of morality, or] injure others in their natural, civil or religious rights; nor ought any
person to be compelled to frequent, or maintain, or contribute, unless on contract, to
maintain, any place of worship, or any ministry; nor shall any person, otherwise competent,
be deemed incompetent as a witness, or juror, on account of [his] THE religious belief[,
provided, he believes in the existence of God, and that under His dispensation such person
will be held morally accountable for his acts, and be rewarded or punished therefor either
in this world or in the world to come] OF THE PERSON.
[Nothing shall prohibit or require the making reference to belief in, reliance upon,
or invoking the aid of God or a Supreme Being in any governmental or public document,
proceeding, activity, ceremony, school, institution, or place.]
Nothing in this article shall constitute an establishment of religion.
Article 37.
That no religious test ought ever to be required as a qualification for any office of
profit or trust in this State[, other than a declaration of belief in the existence of God]; nor
shall the Legislature prescribe any other oath of office than the oath prescribed by this
Constitution.
[Article 39.
That the manner of administering an oath or affirmation to any person, ought to be

HOUSE BILL 822 3
such as those of the religious persuasion, profession, or denomination, of which he is a
member, generally esteem the most effectual confirmation by the attestation of the Divine
Being.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.